tables/en-ueb-g2.ctb
#   don't mix ’ with ' together
match %[_~^]%<* ’twould ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145
match %[_~^]%<* 'twould ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145
match %[_~^]%<* ’twould’ve ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* 'twould've ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* ’twoulda ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-1
match %[_~^]%<* 'twoulda ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-1
match %[_~^]%<* ’twouldn’t ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-1345-3-2345
match %[_~^]%<* 'twouldn't ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-1345-3-2345
match %[_~^]%<* ’twouldn’t’ve ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-1345-3-2345-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* 'twouldn't've ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 3-2345-2456-145-1345-3-2345-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* aboutface ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-124-1-14-15
match %[_~^]%<* aboutfaced ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-124-1-14-1246
match %[_~^]%<* aboutfacer ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-124-1-14-12456
match %[_~^]%<* aboutfacing ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-124-1-14-346
match %[_~^]%<* aboutturn ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-2345-136-1235-1345
match %[_~^]%<* aboutturned ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-2345-136-1235-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* aboveboard ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-1236-12-135-345-145
match %[_~^]%<* aboveground ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-1236-1245-1235-46-145
match %[_~^]%<* abovementioned ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-12-1236-134-26-56-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* accordingly ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-14-123-13456
match %[_~^]%<* aforesaid ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-123456-15-234-145
match %[_~^]%<* afterbattle ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-1-2345-2345-123-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterbirth ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-24-1235-1456
match %[_~^]%<* afterbreakfast ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-1235-2-13-124-1-34
match %[_~^]%<* afterburn ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-136-1235-1345
match %[_~^]%<* afterburned ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-136-1235-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* afterburner ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-136-1235-1345-12456
match %[_~^]%<* afterburning ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-12-136-1235-1345-346
match %[_~^]%<* aftercare ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-14-345-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterclap ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-14-123-1-1234
match %[_~^]%<* aftercoffee ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-14-12356-124-15-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterdamp ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-145-1-134-1234
match %[_~^]%<* afterdark ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-145-345-13
match %[_~^]%<* afterdeck ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-145-15-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* afterdinner ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-145-35-1345-12456
match %[_~^]%<* afterflow ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-124-123-246
match %[_~^]%<* aftergame ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1245-1-134-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterglow ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1245-123-246
match %[_~^]%<* afterguard ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1245-136-345-145
match %[_~^]%<* afterhatch ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-125-1-2345-16
match %[_~^]%<* afterhatches ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-125-1-2345-16-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* afterhour ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-125-1256-1235
match %[_~^]%<* afterlife ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-24-124-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterlight ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-24-126-2345
match %[_~^]%<* afterlives ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-24-1236-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* afterlunch ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-136-1345-16
match %[_~^]%<* afterlunches ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-123-136-1345-16-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* aftermarket ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-345-13-15-2345
match %[_~^]%<* aftermatch ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-1-2345-16
match %[_~^]%<* aftermatches ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-1-2345-16-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* aftermath ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-1-1456
match %[_~^]%<* aftermeeting ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-15-15-2345-346
match %[_~^]%<* aftermentioned ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-26-56-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* aftermidday ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-24-145-5-145
match %[_~^]%<* aftermidnight ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-24-145-1345-24-126-2345
match %[_~^]%<* aftermost ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-134-135-34
match %[_~^]%<* afternoontea ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1345-2345-15-1
match %[_~^]%<* afterpain ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1234-1-35
match %[_~^]%<* afterparties ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-5-1234-24-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* afterparty ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-5-1234-13456
match %[_~^]%<* afterpiece ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1234-24-15-14-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterplay ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1234-123-1-13456
match %[_~^]%<* aftersale ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-234-1-123-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterschool ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-234-16-135-135-123
match %[_~^]%<* aftersensation ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-234-26-234-1-56-1345
match %[_~^]%<* aftershave ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-146-1-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* aftershock ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-146-135-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* aftershow ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-146-246
match %[_~^]%<* aftershower ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-146-246-12456
match %[_~^]%<* aftersupper ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-234-136-1234-1234-12456
match %[_~^]%<* aftertaste ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-1-34-15
match %[_~^]%<* aftertax ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-1-1346
match %[_~^]%<* aftertaxes ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-1-1346-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* aftertea ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-15-1
match %[_~^]%<* aftertheater ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2346-1-2345-12456
match %[_~^]%<* aftertheatre ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2346-1-2345-1235-15
match %[_~^]%<* afterthought ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-1456-5-1256
match %[_~^]%<* aftertime ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-5-2345
match %[_~^]%<* aftertreatment ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-2345-1235-2-2345-56-2345
match %[_~^]%<* afterword ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-45-2456
match %[_~^]%<* afterwork ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-5-2456
match %[_~^]%<* afterworld ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-124-456-2456
match %[_~^]%<* apperceive ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-1234-1234-12456-14-1236
match %[_~^]%<* apperceived ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-1234-1234-12456-14-1236-145
match %[_~^]%<* apperceiver ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-1234-1234-12456-14-1236-1235
match %[_~^]%<* apperceiving ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 1-1234-1234-12456-14-1236-1245
match %[_~^]%<* archdeceiver ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 345-16-145-14-1236-1235
match %[_~^]%<* beforehand ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-124-125-12346
match %[_~^]%<* beforementioned ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-124-134-26-56-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* befriend ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-124-1235
match %[_~^]%<* behindhand ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-125-125-12346
match %[_~^]%<* belittle ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-123
match %[_~^]%<* belittled ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-123-145
match %[_~^]%<* belittlement ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-123-56-2345
match %[_~^]%<* belittler ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* belowdeck ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-145-15-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* belowground ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-1245-1235-46-145
match %[_~^]%<* belowmentioned ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-123-134-26-56-1345-1246
match %[_~^]%<* beneathdeck ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-1345-145-15-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* beneathground ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-1345-1245-1235-46-145
match %[_~^]%<* betweendeck ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-2345-145-15-14-13
match %[_~^]%<* betweentime ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-2345-5-2345
match %[_~^]%<* betweenwhile ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 23-2345-156-24-123-15
match %[_~^]%<* blindfish ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-24-146
match %[_~^]%<* blindfishes ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-24-146-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* blindfold ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-135-123-145
match %[_~^]%<* blindfolded ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-135-123-145-1246
match %[_~^]%<* blindfolder ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-135-123-145-12456
match %[_~^]%<* blindfolding ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-124-135-123-145-346
match %[_~^]%<* blindly ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-123-13456
match %[_~^]%<* blindman ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-134-1-1345
match %[_~^]%<* blindmen ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-134-26
match %[_~^]%<* blindness ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* blindnesses ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-56-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* blindside ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-145-15
match %[_~^]%<* blindsided ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-145-1246
match %[_~^]%<* blindsider ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-145-12456
match %[_~^]%<* blindsiding ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-145-346
match %[_~^]%<* blindsight ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-234-24-126-2345
match %[_~^]%<* blindstories ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-34-135-1235-24-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* blindstory ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-34-135-1235-13456
match %[_~^]%<* blindworm ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-2456-135-1235-134
match %[_~^]%<* bloodletter ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-123-135-135-145-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* boyfriend ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-135-13456-124-1235
match %[_~^]%<* brailled ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-145
match %[_~^]%<* brailler ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* braillewriter ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-2456-1235-24-2345-12456
match %[_~^]%<* braillewriting ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-2456-1235-24-2345-346
match %[_~^]%<* brailley ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-123-13456
match %[_~^]%<* brainchildren ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 12-1235-1-35-16-1345
match %[_~^]%<* chainletter ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 16-1-35-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* children’swear ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 16-1345-3-234-2456-15-345
match %[_~^]%<* children'swear ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 16-1345-3-234-2456-15-345
match %[_~^]%<* colorblind ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-135-1235-12-123
match %[_~^]%<* colorblindness ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-135-1235-12-123-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* colorblindnesses ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-135-1235-12-123-56-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* colourblind ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-1256-1235-12-123
match %[_~^]%<* colourblindness ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-1256-1235-12-123-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* colourblindnesses ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-135-123-1256-1235-12-123-56-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* conceived ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 25-14-1236-145
match %[_~^]%<* conceiver ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 25-14-1236-1235
match %[_~^]%<* could’ve ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* could've ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* coulda ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-1
match %[_~^]%<* couldest ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-15-34
match %[_~^]%<* couldn’t ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-1345-3-2345
match %[_~^]%<* couldn't ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-1345-3-2345
match %[_~^]%<* couldn’t’ve ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-1345-3-2345-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* couldn't've ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-1345-3-2345-3-1236-15
match %[_~^]%<* couldst ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 14-145-34
match %[_~^]%<* deafblind ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 145-2-124-12-123
match %[_~^]%<* deafblindness ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 145-2-124-12-123-56-234
match %[_~^]%<* deafblindnesses ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 145-2-124-12-123-56-234-15-234
match %[_~^]%<* deceived ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-1236-145
match %[_~^]%<* deceiver ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-1236-1235
match %[_~^]%<* declared ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-123-145
match %[_~^]%<* declarer ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 145-14-123-1235
match %[_~^]%<* defriend ([Ss]|['’][Ss])?%>*%[_~^] 145-15-124-1235
